New Jersey, session 222, A974.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Except as otherwise provided by subsection b. of this section, every building used by a public school, private school, or institution of higher education in the State shall be tested for the presence of radon gas or radon progeny at least once every five years.  If a building used by a public school, private school, or institution of higher education has been tested for radon gas or radon progeny within the five-year period preceding the effective date of this act, the test required by this subsection shall be performed on the building within five years of that prior test and once every five years thereafter.  If a building used by a public school, private school, or institution of higher education has not been tested for radon gas or radon progeny within the five-year period preceding the effective date of this act, the test required by this subsection shall be performed on the building within 60 days after the effective date of this act and once every five years thereafter. b.    The Commissioner of Education or the Commissioner of Higher Education, as appropriate, in consultation with the Commissioner of Environmental Protection, shall determine the extent of testing required pursuant to this section. The superintendent of each school district in the State, the board of trustees of a charter school, the principal or chief administrator of a private school, or the chief administrator of the institution of higher education, as applicable, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, shall identify the buildings to be tested, the locations within each building to be tested, the method of testing, and the procedures concerning notification and circulation of the testing results. c.    As used in this section: Institution of higher education means a qualified institution of collegiate grade, located in this State, which is approved by any regional accrediting association recognized by the National Commission on Accrediting or approved by the Department of Higher Education, or any county college or junior college licensed or approved by the department, operated in accordance with rules and regulations of the Board of Higher Education. "Private school" means a school, under college grade, which does not derive its support entirely or in part from public funds.          "Public school" means a school, under college grade, which derives its support entirely or in part from public funds. 2.    Section 3 of P.L.2000, c.122 (C.18A:20-40) is repealed. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.